California statutes. Education Code
 and sharing of career technical education effective practices, curriculum models and courses, and community college credentials, certificates, degrees, and programs across regions and among community college districts.

(2) Enable community college districts to develop career technical education and workforce outcomes, and applicable associate degrees and certificates as appropriate.

(3) Provide accessible performance and labor market data that can be used flexibly by participating community college districts and their regional partners to support the implementation of the Strong Workforce Program and related efforts to align regional workforce and education programming with regional labor market needs.

(4) Encourage local efficiency through coordinated and collaborative regional workforce efforts in which community
 college districts are partners.

(5) Support curriculum processes to ensure that students are able to efficiently transfer college-level career technical education credits across community college districts and to the California State University and the University of California.

(6) Improve sector-based engagement with employers within a region.

(7) Provide, in partnership with employers, work-based learning opportunities for students that increase their employability and earning potential.

(8) Enable community college districts to facilitate and optimize their resources to support the Strong Workforce Program and other related regional workforce development efforts.

(9) Ensure that
 community college district Strong Workforce Program expenditures are focused on improving student success with workforce outcomes for all students enrolled in community college career technical education courses, programs, and pathways.

(10) (A) For the Community College component only, notwithstanding the June 30, 2017, implementation date specified in this subdivision, develop and implement a plan to streamline the course and curriculum approval process, both at the state and local levels. The plan shall reflect an expedited state approval process for career technical education courses, programs, and certificates, and may include the elimination of an existing state course and program approval process. The plan shall reflect one of the following two options:

(i) A process of course and curriculum approval that enables community college districts to develop
 a course or program within one academic year and to offer that course or program the subsequent academic year.

(ii) A process of course and curriculum approval that enables community college districts to develop a course or program within one academic semester and to offer that course or program the subsequent academic semester.

(B) The plan described in subparagraph (A) shall also reflect the creation of a process that enables career technical education courses and programs to be portable among community college districts. This process shall enable a community college district to adapt, adopt, or adapt and adopt another community college district’s approved career technical education courses, programs, and curriculum within one academic semester and to offer that course or program, or
 use that curriculum, the subsequent academic semester.

(C) The chancellor’s office shall consult with the Legislature and the Governor before implementing the plan. The plan shall be developed no later than July 1, 2017, and implemented no later than January 1, 2018.

(11) Eliminate barriers to hiring qualified instructors for career technical education courses, including reevaluating the required minimum qualifications for career technical education instructors.

(g) Community college districts are encouraged to expedite the development of targeted credit or noncredit short-term
 workforce training programs, in accordance with all of the following:

(1) Short-term workforce training programs that focus on economic recovery and result in job placement.

(2) Short-term workforce training programs that focus on the reskilling and upskilling of individuals.

(3) (A) Short-term workforce training programs that have at least one proven employer partner, demonstrate job vacancies, and submit verification to the chancellor’s office.

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), verification includes the projected number of individuals served, completion rates, and job placement rates.

(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that, where possible, short-term
 noncredit workforce training programs should be used to be responsive to the workforce training needs of employers, with the ability to transition to credit or noncredit courses and programs upon successful completion of a program established pursuant to this subdivision. Colleges are encouraged to develop workforce training that uses competency-based approaches, and applies credit for prior learning where possible.

(h) After June 30, 2017, and only as necessary, the chancellor’s office may develop and implement revised polices and guidance for the
 Community College component only, and bring regulations before the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges as necessary for a community college district and its regional partners to accomplish both of the following:

(1) Implement and expand the amount of aligned middle skill and career technical education credentials, certificates, degrees, courses, programs, and pathways in accordance with paragraphs (1) to (11), inclusive, of subdivision (f).

(2) Implement the recommendations of the Strong Workforce Task Force.

(i) No later than June 30, 2026, the chancellor’s office shall revise any policies, regulations, and guidance necessary to provide students, employers, or both, with paid work-based learning opportunities that
 may be directly supported with funds apportioned directly to a community college district pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 88825.

(j) (1) For purposes of this section, the chancellor’s office shall consider input provided by relevant stakeholders, including the Academic Senate of the California Community Colleges, the Workforce Pathways Joint Advisory Committee, and the California Workforce Development Board, before implementing revised guidance, policies, or regulatory changes for the Community College component.

(2) For purposes of the Community College component and in compliance with the consultation requirements in Sections 70901 and 70902, the Academic Senate of the California Community Colleges shall establish a career technical education subcommittee to provide recommendations on career technical education issues. No less than 70 percent of the subcommittee shall consist of career technical education faculty. The subcommittee’s charter shall require it to provide assistance to community college districts to ensure that career technical education and its instruction is responsive and aligned to current and emergent industry trends, and ensure that similar courses, programs, and degrees are portable among community college districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 255, Sec. 1.   (AB 323)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

88822.

For purposes of this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Career pathways” means an identified series of positions, work experiences, or educational benchmarks or credentials that offer occupational and financial advancement within a specified career field or related fields over time.

(b) “Career technical education credential” means a workforce certificate, degree, or industry-recognized credential.

(c) “Career Technical Education Regional Consortium,” or “consortium,” means an administrative grouping of community college districts and local educational agencies by the Division of Workforce and Economic Development of the chancellor’s
 office for the purpose of coordination and joint planning within regions, as defined in subdivision (p). Local educational agencies shall be grouped based on their association with community college districts. In the event that a local educational agency does not fall within the geographical boundaries of any community college district, the local educational agency shall be grouped with the nearest community college district.

(d) “Chancellor’s office” means the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(e) “Community College component” means the funding allocated pursuant to Section 88825.

(f) “Deputy Sector Navigator” means an individual serving as an in-region contact for an industry or occupational cluster, working with the region’s colleges and employers to create alignment around and deliver
 on workforce training and career pathways.

(g) “Industry” or “industry sectors” means trade associations or those firms that produce similar products or provide similar services using somewhat similar business processes.

(h) “Joint powers authority” means an entity established in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for purposes of providing instruction to pupils enrolled in grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(i) “K–12 component” means funding allocated pursuant to Section 88827.

(j) “K–12 Workforce Pathway Coordinator” means an individual serving as an in-region contact to provide technical assistance and support to K–12 local educational agencies pursuant to subdivision (a) of
 Section 88833.

(k) “K–14 Technical Assistance Provider” means an individual serving as the in-region contact pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 88833 to provide leadership and technical assistance regionwide on K–14 career technical education programs or pathways.

(l) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(m) “Middle skill credential” means a certificate, associate’s degree, or industry-recognized credential that is less than a bachelor’s degree but more than a high school diploma and facilitates student success with workforce outcomes.

(n) “Plan” means the regional plan established under this part.

(o) “Program” means
 the Strong Workforce Program established under this part.

(p) “Region” means a geographic area of the state defined by economic and labor market factors containing at least one industry cluster and the cities, counties, community college districts, and local educational agencies, or all of them, in the industry cluster’s geographic area. To the extent possible, for the purposes of this part, collaborative regions should align with federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128) regional planning unit boundaries specified in the California Strategic Workforce and Development Plan and expand upon existing consortium infrastructure established by the chancellor’s office.

(q) “Short-term workforce training program” means a 4 to 12-week program with a proven employer partner designed for targeted reskilling and upskilling that results in job placement.

(r) “Strong Workforce Task Force” means the Task Force on Workforce, Job Creation and a Strong Economy commissioned by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 25, Sec. 12.   (SB 116)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

88823.

(a) This section applies to the Community College component only.

(b) Commencing July 1, 2017, as a condition of receipt of funds allocated pursuant to Section 88825 for a fiscal year, each consortium, in consultation with collaborating entities identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 88821, shall submit a plan to the chancellor’s office that has been updated for that fiscal year.

(c) The plan pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include all of the following requirements:

(1) The names of the community college districts participating in the consortium, including the name of the community college identified as the
 consortium’s fiscal agent, and the names of entities collaborating pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 88821.

(2) The governance model for the consortium. Decisions governing, or relating to, the distribution of fiscal resources shall be determined exclusively by the community college districts participating in the consortium.

(3) An analysis of regional labor market needs informed by a federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128) economic analysis and other sources as applicable. This analysis shall also include wage data for each industry sector or labor market need identified.

(4) An inventory of regionally prioritized and locally prioritized projects and programs that close relevant labor market and employment gaps.

(5) Measurable regional goals that align with the performance accountability measures of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128).

(6) For regionally prioritized projects and programs, a work plan, spending plan, and budget. The work plan, spending plan, and budget shall identify the amount of funding allocated for one-time and ongoing expenditures.

(7) A description of the alignment of work plans, spending plans, and other education and workforce plans guiding services in the region, including plans pertaining to the building of career pathways and the employment of workforce sector strategies and those plans required pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128).

(d) Each consortium shall submit a plan by January 31 once every
 four years and shall annually update the plan by January 31 of each year until the next new plan is submitted.

(e) The chancellor’s office shall review the plans on a four-year cycle and ensure that annual updates are made by each consortium. The chancellor’s office shall determine if each consortium has made significant progress in meeting the goals and measures outlined in its plan, and provide technical assistance to a consortium that has not met its goals. The chancellor’s office is encouraged to provide technical assistance pursuant to this subdivision through the Institutional Effectiveness Partnership Initiative.

(f) To avoid duplication of effort, plans developed pursuant to this section shall be informed by, aligned with, and expand upon regional plans and planning efforts established pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law
 113-128).

(g) Community college districts participating in a consortium shall utilize their region’s plan to inform local campus planning efforts to implement career technical education courses, programs, and pathways and integrate available local, regional, state, and nonpublic resources to ensure that students will achieve successful workforce outcomes.

(h) Community college districts shall meet with the members of their consortium not less than annually to inform on the delivery of career technical education and workforce development courses, programs, and pathways within the region.

(i) Each region’s plan shall be for the primary purpose of informing the development of strategies related to career technical education and workforce development courses, programs, and pathways. Each region’s plan shall reflect
 strategies to efficiently and effectively utilize any available public and private resources, including funds for the Career Technical Education Pathways Program established in Part 52 (commencing with Section 88530), in a manner that better aligns career technical education courses, programs, and pathways with the needs of their regional economies.

(j) It is the intent of the Legislature to align community college career technical education programs within the Strong Workforce Program. Staff from the chancellor’s office, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance are requested to investigate the potential consolidation of community college career technical education programs within the Strong Workforce Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 95.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

88824.

(a) This section only applies for the 2016–17 fiscal year.

(b) To promote the success of community college students and the career technical education programs that serve them, up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated for the program in the annual Budget Act may be allocated by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges to a community college district for statewide activities to improve and administer the program, including the facilitation of system, program, and data alignment at the state and regional levels. The chancellor’s office shall consult with the California Workforce Development Board and other appropriate state agencies on the development of all statewide activities that
 would be implemented by the selected district to facilitate broader workforce and education system alignment. Statewide coordination activities funded out of this allocation may include, but are not limited to, the following activities:

(1) State-level coordination for the development of labor market analyses pertaining to economic and industry trends and jobs projections for the purpose of supporting common regional planning efforts and the alignment of career technical education program offerings with regional labor market dynamics.

(2) Research, evaluation, and technical assistance on the use of effective local and regional policies, best practices, and model partnerships.

(3) Development and prototyping of innovative policies, practices, and coordinated services with local workforce and education partners.

(4) Participation of community college districts in existing regional coalitions and planning efforts.

(5) Cross-training local program staff.

(6) Development and maintenance of a state-level cross-system data reporting mechanism with partners formed pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128) for the purpose of monitoring workforce program outcomes and performance accountability.

(7) Leveraging allocated funds with state and local partners through interagency agreements, memorandums of understanding, or other appropriate mechanisms.

(c) (1) The chancellor’s office shall provide to the Department of Finance and the Legislative
 Analyst’s Office its recommendations for the allocation of funds available for each consortium no later than August 30, 2016. The department shall approve the allocation plan before the release of funding. Each consortium, in consultation with local colleges, community college districts, and the chancellor’s office, shall select a community college to be a fiscal agent that shall directly receive funds apportioned for the consortium in accordance with this section. The chancellor’s office shall determine, for purposes of allocating funds for the consortium and its community college districts, the local unemployment rate, the region’s proportion of career technical education full-time equivalent students, and proportion of projected job openings. Each of these three factors shall comprise one-third of the allocation formula. Funds may be used for regionally prioritized projects and programs and locally prioritized projects and programs that meet regional needs for career technical education and workforce
 development courses, programs, pathways, credentials, certificates, and degrees.

(2) Forty percent of the funds apportioned for the program shall be provided directly to the fiscal agent of the consortium for the purpose of funding regionally prioritized projects and programs that meet the needs of local and regional economies, as identified in regional plans and Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128) regional plans.

(3) Sixty percent of the funds apportioned for the program shall be provided directly to community college districts in the consortium. Funds apportioned directly to a community college district shall be expended for the purpose of funding regionally prioritized projects and programs within the community college district that meet the needs of local and regional economies, as identified in regional plans and Workforce Innovation and Opportunity
 Act (Public Law 113-128) regional plans. As a condition of receiving direct funding, each community college district shall actively participate in its consortium.

(d) As a condition of receipt of funds pursuant to subdivision (c), a community college district shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) Be a member of a consortium.

(2) Participate in regional planning efforts established pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128) and other efforts to align workforce, employment, and education services.

(3) Work with other members of the consortium to create and submit a plan to the chancellor by January 31, 2017, for inclusion in the submissions of regional plans for purposes of the program and the
 federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128).

(4) Provide accessible performance and labor-market data that can be used by community college districts and their regional partners to support the implementation of the program and describe related efforts to align regional workforce and education programming with regional labor market needs, including, but not limited to, regional planning efforts established pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128).

(5) Certify that the use of funds will meet the intent of the program to accomplish all of the following:

(A) Increase the number of students in quality career technical education courses, programs, and pathways that will achieve successful workforce outcomes.

(B) Increase the number of quality career technical education courses, programs, and pathways that lead to successful workforce outcomes, or invest in new or emerging career technical education courses, programs, and pathways that may become operative in subsequent years and are likely to lead to successful workforce outcomes.

(C) Address recommendations from the Strong Workforce Task Force, including the recommended provision of student services related to career exploration, job readiness and job placement, and work-based learning.

(e) Funds appropriated to community college districts for the program shall supplement, not supplant, existing funding of community college career technical education programs. This subdivision shall not be interpreted to mean that a participating community college district is prohibited from
 eliminating or altering existing programs, but the percentage of that community college district’s total full-time equivalent students enrolled in career technical education courses relative to the total full-time equivalent students enrolled in the district shall not be reduced from the percentage computed for the 2015–16 fiscal year.

(f) A consortium shall allocate funds only to community college districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 23.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

88825.

(a) This section applies to the Community College component only, and applies commencing with the 2017–18 fiscal year.

(b) To promote the success of community college students and the career technical education programs that serve them, up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated for the Community College component may be allocated by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges to a community college district for statewide activities to improve and administer the program, including the facilitation of system, program, and data alignment at the state and regional levels and the implementation of the 25 recommendations presented to the board of governors on January 19 and 20, 2016, by the Strong Workforce Task Force. The chancellor’s office shall consult
 with the California Workforce Development Board and other appropriate state agencies on the development of all statewide activities that would be implemented by the selected district to facilitate broader workforce and education system alignment. Statewide coordination activities funded out of this allocation may include, but are not limited to, the following activities:

(1) State-level coordination for the development of labor market analyses pertaining to economic and industry trends and jobs projections for the purpose of supporting common regional planning efforts and the alignment of career technical education program offerings with regional labor market dynamics.

(2) Research, evaluation, and technical assistance on the use of effective local and regional policies, best practices, and model partnerships.

(3) Development and prototyping of innovative policies, practices, and coordinated services with local workforce and education partners.

(4) Participation of community college districts in existing regional coalitions and planning efforts.

(5) Cross-training local program staff.

(6) Development and maintenance of a state-level cross-system data reporting mechanism with partners formed pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128) for the purpose of monitoring workforce program outcomes and performance accountability.

(7) Leveraging allocated funds with state and local partners through interagency agreements, memorandums of understanding, or other appropriate mechanisms.

(c) (1) Forty percent of the funds apportioned for the Community College component of the program shall be apportioned directly to the fiscal agents of the consortia for the purpose of funding regionally prioritized projects and programs that meet the needs of local and regional economies, including development of short-term workforce training programs focused on California’s economic recovery from COVID-19 beginning in 2020, as identified in regional plans and federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128) regional plans.

(2) (A) Sixty percent of the funds apportioned for the Community College component of the program shall be apportioned directly to community college districts in the consortia. Funds
 apportioned directly to a community college district shall be expended for the purpose of funding regionally prioritized projects and programs within the community college district that meet the needs of local and regional economies, including development of short-term workforce training programs focused on California’s economic recovery from COVID-19 beginning in 2020, as identified in regional plans and federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128) regional plans. As a condition of receiving direct funding, each community college district shall actively participate in its consortium.

(B) Funds apportioned directly to a community college district pursuant to subparagraph (A) may also be used for all of the following:

(i) Providing funds for student
 grants to cover fees for third-party certification and licensing.

(ii) Enhancing student services to support retention, work experience, and job placement.

(iii) Providing students with an integrated educational program that connects academic curricula to applied and experiential learning in the workplace, including, but not limited to, work-based learning programs and models.

(iv) Providing direct support to students, employers, or both, for paid work-based learning, including, but not limited to, apprenticeships, internships, externships, and student-run enterprises to increase employability and employment.

(d) The allocation of funds to a
 consortium shall be based on a schedule determined by the chancellor’s office and is effective for the four years of each plan cycle. Within the four-year plan cycle, this schedule may be altered to reflect changes in the statewide allocation for the program as appropriated in the annual Budget Act.

(e) The chancellor’s office shall provide to the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst’s Office its recommendations for the allocation of funds available for each consortium no later than August 30 of each year. The department shall approve the allocation plan before the release of funding.

(f) (1) For each four-year plan cycle, the chancellor’s office shall determine the amount of funds to be allocated to each consortium based on the following weighted factors in each region:

(A) The
 unemployment rate. This factor shall comprise 33 percent of the allocation formula.

(B) The proportion of career technical education full-time equivalent students. This factor shall comprise 33 percent of the allocation formula.

(C) The proportion of projected job openings. This factor shall comprise 17 percent of the allocation formula.

(D) The proportion of successful workforce outcomes as evidenced by the performance accountability measures of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128). This factor shall comprise 17 percent of the allocation formula.

(2) For each four-year plan cycle, the chancellor’s office shall determine the amount of funds to be allocated directly to each community college district within a
 consortium based on the weighted factors, specified in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1), in each district within the region.

(g) A consortium shall allocate funds in accordance with its plan and only to community college districts. Decisions governing, or relating to, the distribution of the consortium’s fiscal resources shall be determined exclusively by the community college districts participating in the consortium.

(h) As a condition of receipt of funds under this section, a participating community college district shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Be a member of a consortium.

(2) Participate in regional planning efforts formed pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128) and
 other efforts that align workforce, employment, and education services.

(3) Work with other consortium members to create and submit a plan to the chancellor’s office by January 31 of every fourth year of a four-year plan cycle.

(4) Provide accessible performance and labor market data that can be used by community college districts and their regional partners to support the implementation of the program and any related efforts to align regional workforce and education programming with regional labor market needs, including, but not limited to, regional planning efforts established pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128).

(5) Include interested public universities and local educational agencies in regional planning.

(6) Certify that the use of funds will meet the intent of the program to accomplish all of the following:

(A) Increase the number of students in quality career technical education courses, programs, and pathways that will achieve successful workforce outcomes.

(B) Increase the number of quality career technical education courses, programs, and pathways that lead to successful workforce outcomes, or invest in new or emerging career technical education courses, programs, and pathways that may become operative in subsequent years and are likely to lead to successful workforce outcomes.

(C) Address recommendations from the Strong Workforce Task Force, including the recommended provision of student services related to career exploration, job readiness and job placement, and work-based learning.

(i) Funds appropriated to community college districts for the program shall supplement, not supplant, existing funding of community college career technical education programs. This subdivision does not prohibit a participating community college district from eliminating or altering existing programs, but the percentage of that community college district’s total full-time equivalent students enrolled in career technical education courses relative to the total full-time equivalent students enrolled in the district shall not be reduced from the percentage computed for the 2015–16 fiscal year.

(j) Programs, courses, or instructional materials developed using funding from the program may be made available to all community college districts, as appropriate, through the online clearinghouse of information created as part of the Institutional Effectiveness Partnership Initiative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 255, Sec. 2.   (AB 323)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

88826.

(a) This section applies to the Community College component only.

(b) The chancellor’s office shall post on its internet website, for ease of access, all regional plans and their subsequent progress plans, and solicit feedback from each consortium on recommendations they have for overall program improvement.

(c) The chancellor’s office shall implement performance accountability outcome measures for the Community College component of the program that provide the Governor, the Legislature, and the general public with information that quantifies employer and student outcomes for those participating in the program. These performance accountability measures shall, to the extent possible, align with the
 performance accountability measures of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128). Outcome measures shall include demographic data, disaggregated by race and gender, to allow policymakers and the general public to evaluate progress in closing equity gaps in program access and completion, and earnings of underserved demographic groups.

(d) (1) Commencing in 2018, the chancellor’s office shall submit a report on the Community College component of the program to the Governor and the Legislature on or before the January 1, except as provided in paragraph (2), immediately subsequent to the fiscal year which the report addresses.

(2) Beginning in the 2025–26 fiscal year, the chancellor’s office shall submit the report described in paragraph (1) annually, on or before March 1, to the Governor and the Legislature, and may submit this report with the report required by subdivision (b) of Section 88650.

(3) A report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Data summarizing outcome accountability performance measures collected by the chancellor’s office pursuant to subdivision (c), disaggregated by race and gender.

(B) A summary of recommendations for program improvement
 collected by the chancellor’s office pursuant to subdivision (b).

(C) Recommendations for future allocations to consortiums based upon program outcomes, including, at a minimum, the number of certificates granted to, and wage increases of, students who have completed a career technical education program.

(4) A report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 998, Sec. 29.   (AB 176)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

88826.5.

(a) (1) Beginning in July 1, 2019, and in each year thereafter, except as provided in paragraph (2), for each community college program that offers certificates or degrees related to allied health professionals, the chancellor shall provide a report to the Legislature, with comparative clinical placement delineated by program and occupation. The report shall include both of the following:

(A) The number of students participating at each clinical training site. This shall include information about proficiency in languages other than English.

(B) The license number of each clinical training site. If the license number is not available, the report shall include the employer
 identification number of the clinical training site.

(2) Beginning in the
 2026–27 fiscal year, the chancellor shall provide the report described in paragraph (1) to the Legislature triennially, on or before December 31, and may submit the report with the report required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 78261.

(b) The collection and reporting of findings pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be implemented over multiple years, and collected by the chancellor’s office as follows:

(1) Beginning in the
 2019–20 academic year, the chancellor’s office shall collect from colleges, and report on, the following allied healthcare professional degrees and certificates:

(A) Licensed Vocational Nurse.

(B) Medical Assistant.

(C) Occupational Therapy Aide.

(D) Radiologic Technologist.

(E) Respiratory Care Therapist.

(F) Pharmacy Technician and Technologist.

(G) Surgical Technician and Technologist.

(2) Beginning in the 2020–21 academic year, the chancellor’s office shall collect from colleges, and report on,
 the following allied healthcare professional degrees and certificates:

(A) Cardiovascular Technologist.

(B) Certified Nurse Assistant.

(C) Dialysis Technician.

(D) Diagnostic Medical Sonographer.

(E) Medical Lab Technician.

(F) Orthopedic Assistant.

(G) Physical Therapy Aide and Assistant.

(H) Psychiatric Technologist.

(I) Radiologic Therapist.

(J) Speech Language
 Pathology Aide.

(3) Beginning in the 2026–27 academic year, the chancellor’s office shall annually collect from colleges, and report
 triennially on, all certificates or degrees related to allied health professionals that require clinical training.

(c) Any disclosure under this section shall be in compliance with state and federal privacy laws.

(d) For purposes of this section, “allied health professional” has the same meaning as in Section 295p of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 28.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

88827.

(a) This section applies to the K–12 component only.

(b) Commencing with the 2018–19 fiscal year, the amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act for the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program is provided to create, support, or expand high-quality career technical education programs at the K–12 level that are aligned with the workforce development efforts occurring through the Strong Workforce Program.

(c) (1) Pursuant to subdivision (b), one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) shall be apportioned by the chancellor’s office to the fiscal agent of each consortium based on the following weighted factors in each region:

(A) The unemployment rate. This factor shall comprise 33 percent of the allocation formula.

(B) The region’s total average daily attendance for pupils in grades 7 to 12, inclusive. This factor shall comprise 33 percent of the allocation formula. For purposes of this section, average daily attendance shall be those figures that are reported at the time of the second principal apportionment for the previous fiscal year.

(C) The proportion of projected job openings. This factor shall comprise 34 percent of the allocation formula.

(2) Of the amounts apportioned to each consortium pursuant to paragraph (1), 4 percent is designated for applicants with total average daily attendance of less than or equal to 140, 8 percent is designated for applicants with total